Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5993.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 40-13.2-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-13.2 entitled
"Certification of Childcare and Youth-Serving Workers and Operators" is hereby amended to read
as follows:
40-13.2-5. Criminal records check — Employees of child day care, daycare centers,
family daycare homes, group family daycare homes, child-placing agencies and residential
childcare facilities that must be licensed by the department.
(a) Any person seeking employment in a “child day care” program, a “family daycare
home,” “group family daycare home,” or in a “child daycare center” as defined in § 42-12.5-2, if
that employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves
routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, or any adult
household member of any operator of a “family daycare home” and “group family daycare home,”
or seeking that employment or to volunteer at the training school for youth, shall, after acceptance
by the employer of the affidavit required by § 40-13.2-3, apply to the bureau of criminal
identification of the state police or the local police department, or the office of the attorney general,
or the department of children, youth and families, for a nationwide criminal records check. The
check will conform to applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify
the applicant. Further, any person seeking employment in a “child day care” program, in a “child
daycare center,” and/or in a “child daycare provider” as defined in § 42-12.5-2, if that employment

involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with
a child or children without the presence of other employees shall apply to the bureau of criminal
identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney general
to conduct all necessary criminal background checks as required by the Child Care and
Development Block Grant of 2014 (CCDBGA), Pub. L. No. 113-186. The criminal record checks
as required by this section shall be conducted for every five (5) years of continuous childcare
employment from the date of the previous criminal background check.
(b) Any person seeking employment in a “child-placing agency” as defined in § 42-72.1-
2, if that employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or
involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, shall,
after acceptance by the employer of the affidavit required by § 40-13.2-3, apply to the bureau of
criminal identification of the state police or the local police department, or the office of the attorney
general or the department of children, youth and families, for a nationwide criminal records check.
The check will conform to applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to
identify the applicant.
(c) Any person seeking employment in a “childcaring agency,” “children’s behavioral
health program,” or in a “foster and adoptive home” as defined in § 42-72.1-2, that is, or is required
to be, licensed or registered with the department of children, youth and families, shall, after
acceptance by the employer of the affidavit required by § 40-13.2-3, apply to the bureau of criminal
identification of the state police or the local police department, or the office of the attorney general,
or the department of children, youth and families, for a nationwide criminal records check. The
check will conform to applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify
the applicant.
(d) [Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 8.]
(e) Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information as defined in accordance with the
rule promulgated by the director, the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local
police department or the office of the attorney general or the department of children, youth and
families will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information. In
addition, the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the office of the attorney general,
or department of children, youth and families, or the local police department will inform the
relevant employer, in writing, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, that
an item of disqualifying information has been discovered.
(f) In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of
criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney
LC002001 - Page 2 of 4

general, or the department of children, youth and families will inform both the applicant and the
employer, in writing, that no disqualifying information has been found.
(g) Failure to show proof that the employer has initiated requests for background checks
required by this section will be prima facie grounds to revoke the license or registration of the
operator of the facility.
(h) It will be the responsibility of the bureau of criminal identification of the state police
or the office of the attorney general, or the every local police department, or the department of
children, youth and families, to conduct the comprehensive nationwide criminal records check
pursuant to this section. The comprehensive nationwide criminal records check will be provided to
the applicant for employment. Any expense associated for providing the criminal records check to
an existing employee shall be paid by the applicant and/or the requesting agency. Effective July 1,
2025, any new applicant, which shall include any person who has submitted an application for
employment to any agency or entity regulated by this section, shall be exempt from the payment
provisions of this section and the nationwide criminal records check shall be conducted at no
charge.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002001
========
LC002001 - Page 3 of 4